Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1074
School district or learning community; taxable property; certification.

The county clerk of any county in which a part of a school district or learning community is located shall, on or before the date prescribed in subsection (1) of section 13-509, certify the taxable valuation of all taxable property of such part of the school district or learning community to the clerk of the headquarters county in which the schoolhouse or the administrative office of the school district or learning community is located.

Laws 1907, c. 118, § 1, p. 398;

Laws 1913, c. 6, § 1, p. 64;

R.S.1913, § 6741;

C.S.1922, § 6282;

C.S.1929, § 79-214;

R.S.1943, § 79-213;

Laws 1947, c. 272, § 1, p. 876;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 72, p. 717;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 228;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 184;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-433;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 720;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 95;

Laws 2019, LB524, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 39.